Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-125
Certification and verification of credentials.

(1) Upon request and payment of the required fee, the department shall provide certification of a credential which shall include a certified statement that provides information regarding the basis on which a credential was issued, the date of issuance, and whether disciplinary action has been taken against the credential.

(2) Upon request and payment of the required fee, the department shall provide verification of a credential which shall include written confirmation as to whether a credential is valid at the time the request is made.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 44, p. 465;

C.S.1929, § 71-506;

R.S.1943, § 71-145;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 44;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 36;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 381;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-145;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 25.